trunk/apertium-mk-en/apertium-mk-en.mk.dix
<pardef n="ма/же__vblex">  <!-- imperf"/><s n="tv -->
  <e>        <p>          <l>жи</l>          <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>жете</l>        <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>        <p>          <l>жам</l>         <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>жеш</l>         <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>же</l>          <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>жеме</l>        <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>жете</l>        <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>жат</l>         <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>        <p>          <l>жев</l>         <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>жеше</l>        <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>жеше</l>        <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>жевме</l>       <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>жевте</l>       <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>жеа</l>         <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>        <p>          <l>жел</l>         <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>жела</l>        <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>жело</l>        <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>желе</l>        <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>        <p>          <l>зав</l>          <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>за</l>           <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>за</l>           <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>завме</l>        <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>завте</l>        <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>заа</l>          <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>        <p>          <l>зал</l>          <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>зала</l>         <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>зало</l>         <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>зале</l>         <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>        <p>          <l>зан</l>          <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>заниот</l>         <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>заниов</l>         <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>занион</l>         <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>зана</l>         <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>заната</l>         <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>занава</l>         <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>занана</l>         <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>зано</l>         <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>заното</l>         <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>заново</l>         <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>заноно</l>         <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>зани</l>         <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>заните</l>         <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>заниве</l>         <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>занине</l>         <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>

  <e>        <p>          <l>жејќи</l>         <r>же<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

	    <e lm="маже"><i>ма</i><par n="ма/же__vblex"/></e>
	    <e lm="реже"><i>ре</i><par n="ма/же__vblex"/></e>
